Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2721
Termination of custodianship.

The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property to the minor or to the minor's estate upon the earlier of:

(1) The minor's attainment of twenty-one years of age with respect to custodial property transferred under section 43-2705 or 43-2706;

(2) The minor's attainment of majority under section 43-2101 with respect to custodial property transferred under section 43-2707 or 43-2708; or

(3) The minor's death.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 21.